it: posizione del tappo CV: Entrambi/universale; Interno (lato cambio); Esterno (lato ruota); Altro
hu: CV gumiharang pozíciója: Mindkettő / univerzális; Belső (váltóoldali); Külső (kerékoldali); Egyéb
nb: Plassering av CV-mansjett: Begge / universell; Indre; Ytre; Annet
en: CV boot position: Both / universal; Inner (inboard); Outer (outboard); Other
zh-CN: CV 防尘套位置: 两侧 / 通用; 内侧; 外侧; 其他
sv: CV-stötfångarposition: Båda / universell; Inre; Yttre; Annat
pt-PT: Posição da coifa da junta homocinética: Ambos/universal; Interior (lado da caixa); Exterior (lado da roda); Outra
de: Position der CV-Manschette: Beide / Universal; Innen (getriebeseitig); Außen (radseitig); Sonstige
sl-SI: Položaj manšete homokinetičnega zgloba: Oboje / univerzalno; Notranja (kolesna stran); Zunanja (stran kolesa); Drugo
el: Θέση φούσκας ημιαξονίου: Και τα δύο/γενικής χρήσης; Εσωτερική; Εξωτερική; Άλλο
zh-TW: CV 防塵套位置: 兩側 / 通用; 內側; 外側; 其他
nl: CV-hoes positie: Beide / universeel; Binnen (bakzijde); Buiten (wielzijde); Overig
th: ตำแหน่งยางหุ้มเพลาขับ: ทั้งคู่ / ใช้ได้ทั่วไป; ด้านใน; ด้านนอก; อื่นๆ
tr: Aks körüğünün konumu: Her ikisi / evrensel; İç; Dış; Diğer
ja: CVブーツの位置: 両方 / ユニバーサル; インナー (インボード); アウター (アウトボード); その他
da: Drivakselmanchettens position: Begge/universel; Indvendig (indre); Udvendig (ydre); Andet
pt-BR: Posição da coifa da junta homocinética: Ambas/universal; Interna; Externa; Outros
vi: Vị trí bọc khớp CV: Cả hai / dùng chung; Bên trong (phía trong); Bên ngoài (phía ngoài); Khác
hr-HR: Položaj manžete homokineze: Obje / univerzalno; Unutarnja; Vanjska; Ostalo
cs: Konfigurace kol pouzdra pro činely a buben: Obě / univerzální; Vnitřní; Vnější; Jiné
sk-SK: Poloha manžety homokinetického kĺbu: Obe/univerzálne; Vnútorná strana; Vonkajšia strana; Iné
fr: Emplacement du soufflet de cardan: Les deux / universel; Intérieur (côté boîte); Extérieur (côté roue); Autre
ro-RO: Poziția protecției CV: Ambele / universal; Interior; Exterior; Altele
pl: Położenie osłony przegubu CV: Obie / uniwersalna; Wewnętrzna (od strony skrzyni); Zewnętrzna (od strony koła); Inna
bg-BG: Позиция на маншона на карето: И двете / универсален; Вътрешен; Външен; Други
fi: Vetonivelen suojakumin paikka: Molemmat / yleismalli; Sisempi (vaihteiston puoli); Ulompi (pyörän puoli); Muu
es: Posición del fuelle de la junta homocinética: Ambos / universal; Interior; Exterior; Otro
ru: Расположение пыльника ШРУСа на полуоси: Оба / универсальный; Внутренний; Внешний; Другое
ko: CV 부트 위치: 양쪽/범용; 내부(인보드); 외부(아웃보드); 기타
lt-LT: CV manžetės padėtis: Abu / universalus; Vidinis; Išorinis; Kita